apertium-cat-srd.srd.dix
    <pardef n="sig/hire__vblex" c="p.48">
      <e>       <p><l>hire</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hire</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantare"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>hendi</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>hendi</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>hende</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hende</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>o</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>his</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hit</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>himus</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hides</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hint</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>hia</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hias</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hiat</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hiamus</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hiais</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hiant</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>a</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>as</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>at</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>amus</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ais</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ant</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>hire</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hires</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hiret</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hiremus</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hireis</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hirent</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>hi</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hi</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>gat</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>gamus</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ghide</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>gant</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>hidu</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hida</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hidos</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>hidas</l><r>hire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="sighire"><i>sig</i><par n="sig/hire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cunsighire"><i>cunsig</i><par n="sig/hire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pessighire"><i>pessig</i><par n="sig/hire__vblex"/></e>
